Maryland, session 2026, SB0105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–702.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) [and], (c), AND (D) of this section, § 3–711 of this
subtitle, and Title 7, Subtitle 5 of this article, an incarcerated individual committed to the
custody of the Commissioner is entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s
term of confinement as provided under this subtitle.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–303 or § 3–304 of the Criminal Law Article
involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years, or an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–305 or § 3–306 of the Criminal Law Article,
as the sections existed before October 1, 2017, involving a victim who is a child under the
age of 16 years, is not entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of
confinement as provided under this subtitle.
(2) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of
§ 3–303 of the Criminal Law Article that occurred on or after October 1, 2024, is not entitled
to diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided under this
subtitle.
(c) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–307
of the Criminal Law Article involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years is
not entitled to a diminution of the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided
under this subtitle, if the incarcerated individual was previously convicted of a violation of
§ 3–307 of the Criminal Law Article involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16
years.
(D) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE FOR A
VIOLATION OF § 2–201 OR § 2–204 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE IS NOT
ENTITLED TO A DIMINUTION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TERM OF
CONFINEMENT AS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
3–707.

SENATE BILL 105 3
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, in addition to
any other deductions allowed under this subtitle, an incarcerated individual may be
allowed a deduction of up to 20 days from the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement
for each calendar month during which the incarcerated individual manifests satisfactory
progress in those special selected work projects or other special programs, including
recidivism reduction programming, designated by the Commissioner and approved by the
Secretary.
(2) The deduction described in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
calculated at the rate of up to 10 days for each calendar month, if an incarcerated
individual’s term of confinement includes a consecutive or concurrent sentence for:
(i) a crime of violence, as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(ii) a sexual offense for which registration is required under Title 11,
Subtitle 7 of the Criminal Procedure Article; or
(iii) a crime of manufacturing, distributing, dispensing, or possessing
a controlled dangerous substance in violation of § 5–612 or § 5–613 of the Criminal Law
Article.
3–708.
(A) Except as provided in § 3–706.1 of this subtitle, and notwithstanding any
other provision of this subtitle, an incarcerated individual may not be allowed a deduction
under this subtitle of more than:
(1) 20 days for a calendar month for an incarcerated individual described
in [§ 3–707(a)(2)] § 3–707(A)(2)(II) AND (III) of this subtitle; and
(2) 30 days for a calendar month for all other incarcerated individuals.
(B) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE FOR A
CRIME OF VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, MAY
NOT BE ALLOWED A DEDUCTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THAT AMOUNTS TO A
NUMBER OF DAYS THAT IS GREATER THAN 10% OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S AGGREGATE SENTENCE FOR CRIMES OF VIOLENCE.
11–502.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) [and], (c), AND (D) of this section, an
incarcerated individual who has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment shall be allowed
deductions from the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided under this
subtitle for any period of presentence or postsentence confinement in a local correctional
facility.

SENATE BILL 105
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–303 or § 3–304 of the Criminal Law Article
involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years, or an incarcerated individual
who is serving a sentence for a violation of § 3–305 or § 3–306 of the Criminal Law Article,
as the sections existed before October 1, 2017, involving a victim who is a child under the
age of 16 years, may not be allowed deductions from the incarcerated individual’s term of
confinement as provided under this subtitle for any period of presentence or postsentence
confinement in a local correctional facility.
(2) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of
§ 3–303 of the Criminal Law Article that occurred on or after October 1, 2024, may not be
allowed deductions from the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided
under this subtitle for any period of presentence or postsentence confinement in a local
correctional facility.
(3) This subsection may not be construed to require an incarcerated
individual to serve a longer sentence of confinement than is authorized by the statute under
which the incarcerated individual was convicted.
(c) (1) An incarcerated individual who is serving a sentence for a violation of
§ 3–307 of the Criminal Law Article involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16
years, who has previously been convicted of violating § 3–307 of the Criminal Law Article
involving a victim who is a child under the age of 16 years, may not be allowed deductions
from the incarcerated individual’s term of confinement as provided under this subtitle for
any period of presentence or postsentence confinement in a local correctional facility.
(2) This subsection may not be construed to require an incarcerated
individual to serve a longer sentence of confinement than is authorized by the statute under
which the incarcerated individual was convicted.
(D) (1) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE
FOR A VIOLATION OF § 2–201 OR § 2–204 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE MAY NOT
BE ALLOWED DEDUCTIONS FROM THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S TERM OF
CONFINEMENT AS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR ANY PERIOD OF
PRESENTENCE OR POSTSENTENCE CONFINEMENT IN A LOCAL CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO SERVE A LONGER SENTENCE OF CONFINEMENT
THAN IS AUTHORIZED BY THE STATUTE UNDER WHICH THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL WAS CONVICTED.
11–507.1.
AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE FOR A CRIME

SENATE BILL 105 5
OF VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, MAY NOT
BE ALLOWED A DEDUCTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THAT AMOUNTS TO A NUMBER OF
DAYS THAT IS GREATER THAN 10% OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S
AGGREGATE SENTENCE FOR CRIMES OF VIOLENCE.
Article – Criminal Procedure
5–202.
(a) A District Court commissioner may not authorize pretrial release for a
defendant charged with escaping from a correctional facility or any other place of
confinement in the State.
(b) (1) A District Court commissioner may not authorize the pretrial release of
a defendant charged as a drug kingpin under § 5–613 of the Criminal Law Article.
(2) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, A
judge may authorize the pretrial release of a defendant charged as a drug kingpin on
suitable bail and on any other conditions that will reasonably ensure that the defendant
will not flee or pose a danger to another person or the community.
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that, if released, a defendant charged
as a drug kingpin will flee and pose a danger to another person or the community.
(c) (1) A District Court commissioner may not authorize the pretrial release of
a defendant charged with a crime of violence if the defendant has been previously convicted:
(i) in this State of a crime of violence;
(ii) in any other jurisdiction of a crime that would be a crime of
violence if committed in this State; or
(iii) of an offense listed in subsection (f)(1) of this section.
(2) (i) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS
SECTION, A judge may authorize the pretrial release of a defendant described in paragraph
(1) of this subsection on:
1. suitable bail;
2. any other conditions that will reasonably ensure that the
defendant will not flee or pose a danger to another person or the community; or
3. both bail and other conditions described under item 2 of
this subparagraph.

SENATE BILL 105
(ii) When a defendant described in paragraph (1) of this subsection
is presented to the court under Maryland Rule 4–216(f), the judge shall order the continued
detention of the defendant IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION
OR if the judge determines that neither suitable bail nor any condition or combination of
conditions will reasonably ensure that the defendant will not flee or pose a danger to
another person or the community before the trial.
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that a defendant described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection will flee and pose a danger to another person or the
community.
(d) (1) A District Court commissioner may not authorize the pretrial release of
a defendant charged with committing one of the following crimes while the defendant was
released on bail or personal recognizance for a pending prior charge of committing one of
the following crimes:
(i) aiding, counseling, or procuring arson in the first degree under §
6–102 of the Criminal Law Article;
(ii) arson in the second degree or attempting, aiding, counseling, or
procuring arson in the second degree under § 6–103 of the Criminal Law Article;
(iii) burglary in the first degree under § 6–202 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(iv) burglary in the second degree under § 6–203 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(v) burglary in the third degree under § 6–204 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(vi) causing abuse to a child under § 3–601 or § 3–602 of the Criminal
Law Article;
(vii) a crime that relates to a destructive device under § 4–503 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(viii) a crime that relates to a controlled dangerous substance under
§§ 5–602 through 5–609 or § 5–612 or § 5–613 of the Criminal Law Article;
(ix) manslaughter by vehicle or vessel under § 2–209 of the Criminal
Law Article; and
(x) a crime of violence.
(2) A defendant under this subsection remains ineligible to give bail or be
released on recognizance on the subsequent charge until all prior charges have finally been

SENATE BILL 105 7
determined by the courts.
(3) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, A
judge may authorize the pretrial release of a defendant described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection on suitable bail and on any other conditions that will reasonably ensure that the
defendant will not flee or pose a danger to another person or the community.
(4) There is a rebuttable presumption that a defendant described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection will flee and pose a danger to another person or the
community if released before final determination of the prior charge.
(e) (1) A District Court commissioner may not authorize the pretrial release of
a defendant charged with violating:
(i) the provisions of a temporary protective order described in §
4–505(a)(2)(i) of the Family Law Article or the provisions of a protective order described in
§ 4–506(d)(1) of the Family Law Article that order the defendant to refrain from abusing or
threatening to abuse a person eligible for relief; or
(ii) the provisions of an order for protection, as defined in § 4–508.1
of the Family Law Article, issued by a court of another state or of a Native American tribe
that order the defendant to refrain from abusing or threatening to abuse a person eligible
for relief, if the order is enforceable under § 4–508.1 of the Family Law Article.
(2) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, A
judge may allow the pretrial release of a defendant described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection on:
(i) suitable bail;
(ii) any other conditions that will reasonably ensure that the
defendant will not flee or pose a danger to another person or the community; or
(iii) both bail and other conditions described under item (ii) of this
paragraph.
(3) When a defendant described in paragraph (1) of this subsection is
presented to the court under Maryland Rule 4–216(f), the judge shall order the continued
detention of the defendant IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION
OR if the judge determines that neither suitable bail nor any condition or combination of
conditions will reasonably ensure that the defendant will not flee or pose a danger to
another person or the community before the trial.
(f) (1) A District Court commissioner may not authorize the pretrial release of
a defendant charged with one of the following crimes if the defendant has previously been
convicted of a crime of violence or one of the following crimes:

SENATE BILL 105
(i) wearing, carrying, or transporting a handgun under § 4–203 of
the Criminal Law Article;
(ii) use of a handgun or an antique firearm in commission of a crime
under § 4–204 of the Criminal Law Article;
(iii) violating prohibitions relating to assault weapons under § 4–303
of the Criminal Law Article;
(iv) use of a machine gun in a crime of violence under § 4–404 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(v) use of a machine gun for an aggressive purpose under § 4–405 of
the Criminal Law Article;
(vi) use of a weapon as a separate crime under § 5–621 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(vii) possession of a regulated firearm under § 5–133 of the Public
Safety Article;
(viii) transporting a regulated firearm for unlawful sale or trafficking
under § 5–140 of the Public Safety Article; or
(ix) possession of a rifle or shotgun by a person with a mental
disorder under § 5–205 of the Public Safety Article.
(2) (i) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS
SECTION, A judge may authorize the pretrial release of a defendant described in paragraph
(1) of this subsection on:
1. suitable bail;
2. any other conditions that will reasonably ensure that the
defendant will not flee or pose a danger to another person or the community; or
3. both bail and other conditions described under item 2 of
this subparagraph.
(ii) When a defendant described in paragraph (1) of this subsection
is presented to the court under Maryland Rule 4–216(f), the judge shall order the continued
detention of the defendant IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION
OR if the judge determines that neither suitable bail nor any condition or combination of
conditions will reasonably ensure that the defendant will not flee or pose a danger to
another person or the community before the trial.
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that a defendant described in

SENATE BILL 105 9
paragraph (1) of this subsection will flee and pose a danger to another person or the
community.
(g) (1) A District Court commissioner may not authorize the pretrial release of
a defendant who:
(i) is registered, or the commissioner knows is required to register,
under Title 11, Subtitle 7 of this article; or
(ii) is a sex offender who is required to register by another
jurisdiction, a federal, military, or tribal court, or a foreign government.
(2) (i) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS
SECTION, A judge may authorize the pretrial release of a defendant described in paragraph
(1) of this subsection on:
1. suitable bail;
2. any other conditions that will reasonably ensure that the
defendant will not flee or pose a danger to another person or the community; or
3. both bail and other conditions described under item 2 of
this subparagraph.
(ii) When a defendant described in paragraph (1) of this subsection
is presented to the court under Maryland Rule 4–216(f), the judge shall order the continued
detention of the defendant IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION
OR if the judge determines that neither suitable bail nor any condition or combination of
conditions will reasonably ensure that the defendant will not flee or pose a danger to
another person or the community before the trial.
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that a defendant described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection will flee and pose a danger to another person or the
community.
(H) A JUDICIAL OFFICER MAY NOT AUTHORIZE THE PRETRIAL RELEASE OF
A DEFENDANT WHO IS CHARGED WITH A CRIME OF VIOLENCE IF THE DEFENDANT:
(1) HAS A PENDING CHARGE FOR:
(I) A CRIME OF VIOLENCE IN THE STATE; OR
(II) A CRIME IN ANY OTHER JURISDICTION THAT WOULD BE A
CRIME OF VIOLENCE IF COMMITTED IN THE STATE; OR
(2) WAS CONVICTED WITHIN THE PREVIOUS 10 YEARS:

SENATE BILL 105
(I) IN THE STATE OF A CRIME OF VIOLENCE; OR
(II) IN ANY OTHER JURISDICTION OF A CRIME THAT WOULD BE
A CRIME OF VIOLENCE IF COMMITTED IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any offense committed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.